Missouri, session 2026, SB1778.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.281, to read as
follows:
170.281. 1. As used in this section, "personal
finance" means a course consisting of financial literacy and
up-to-date tools, resources, and discipline necessary to
succeed in a personal and professional capacity in the
current economy.
2. Any instruction regarding financial literacy shall
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Earning income and understanding paychecks;
(2) Budgeting and managing expenses;
(3) Saving and long-term financial planning;
(4) Banking and financial services;
(5) Understanding credit, loans, and interest;
(6) Responsible use of credit cards;
(7) Investing, retirement accounts, and compound
interest;
(8) Fraud prevention and financial safety;
(9) Taxes and civic financial responsibilities; and

SB 1778 2
(10) Understanding contracts and major purchases,
including housing and automobiles.
3. (1) The department of elementary and secondary
education shall convene a work group to develop and
recommend academic performance standards relating to the one-
half unit of credit of personal finance required by the
state board of education. The work group shall include, but
not be limited to:
(a) Educators providing instruction in personal
finance;
(b) A representative from the department of elementary
and secondary education; and
(c) Up to two representatives from each of the
following:
a. The banking industry;
b. Entrepreneurs in the business community;
c. Nonprofit organizations that focus on educating
young professionals and entrepreneurs;
d. The investment industry;
e. The student loan industry;
f. The retirement planning industry; and
g. The insurance industry.
(2) The total number of members of the work group
shall be determined by the department. At least twenty-five
percent of the total shall be educators providing
instruction in personal finance.
4. The state board of education shall adopt and
implement academic performance standards relating to
personal finance for the 2027-28 school year and all
subsequent school years, except that academic performance
standards relating to personal finance shall be reviewed
every seven years to determine if the performance standards

SB 1778 3
need to be updated to reflect trends and best practices in
the current economy.
5. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent
school years, each school district shall require that after
the completion of grade nine each student satisfactorily
completes such one-half unit of credit of personal finance
before receiving a high school diploma or certificate of
graduation.
(2) A school district may elect to waive the
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection for a
student who transfers from outside the state to a Missouri
high school if the student can furnish documentation deemed
acceptable by the school district of the student's
successful completion of a substantially similar course of
instruction.
(3) A school district may allow a student in grade
nine to complete such one-half unit of credit of personal
finance if, on the recommendation of a school counselor,
completing such one-half unit of credit of personal finance
is beneficial and appropriate for such student's personal
plan of study or career academic plan.
6. The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply
to this section.
✓